apertium-ckb/apertium-ckb.ckb.twol
Alphabet
 A B Ç D E Ê Ä F G H I J Ž K L M N Ň O Ö P R S Ş T U Ü W Y Ý Z
 a b ç d e ê ä f g h i j ž k l m n ň o ö p r s ş t u ü w y ý z
 %{A%}:a %>:0  
%{VSUF%}:0 
%{VSUF%}:i

;
Sets

Vowel = A E Ä I O Ö U Ü Y Ý Ê
        a e ä i o ö u ü y ý ê;

Cons = B C Ç D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Y Z
       b c ç d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z
;
Rules 

"Remove final e if suffix starts with e or a"
e:0 <=> _  %>:0 %{VSUF%}:0 [e | a] ;

"Remove suffix e if stem ends with a"
e:0 <=> a %>:0 %{VSUF%}:0 _ Cons ; 

 "Insert i between stem-final ê/a and a "
%{VSUF%}:i <=> [ê | a] %>:0 _ a ;

 "Insert i between stem-final e and ê "
%{VSUF%}:i <=> e %>:0 _ ê ;

 "Insert i between stem-final a and e"
%{VSUF%}:i <=> [ê | a]  %>:0 _ [e | ê] ;


! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
